Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2190.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 805 of the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act, is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTIONS 805 AND 1001 OF THE ACT OF JULY 23, 1970 (P.L.563, NO.195), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC EMPLOYE RELATIONS ACT, <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122 ARE AMENDED TO READ:Section 805. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act where representatives of units of guards at prisons or mental hospitals, units of peace officers as defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions) who are covered by this act or units of employes directly involved with and necessary to the functioning of the courts of this Commonwealth have reached an impasse in collective bargaining and mediation as required in section 801 of this article has not resolved the dispute, the impasse shall be submitted to a panel of arbitrators whose decision shall be final and binding upon both parties with the proviso that the decisions of the arbitrators which would require legislative enactment to be effective shall be considered advisory only.SECTION 1001. STRIKES BY GUARDS AT PRISONS OR MENTAL HOSPITALS, UNITS OF PEACE OFFICERS AS DEFINED UNDER 18 PA.C.S. § 501 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) WHO ARE COVERED BY THIS ACT OR EMPLOYES DIRECTLY INVOLVED WITH AND NECESSARY TO THE FUNCTIONING OF THE COURTS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH ARE PROHIBITED AT ANY TIME. IF A STRIKE OCCURS THE PUBLIC EMPLOYER SHALL FORTHWITH INITIATE IN THE COURT OF COMMON PLEAS OF THE JURISDICTION WHERE THE STRIKE OCCURS, AN ACTION FOR APPROPRIATE EQUITABLE RELIEF INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO INJUNCTIONS. IF THE STRIKE INVOLVES COMMONWEALTH EMPLOYES, THE CHIEF LEGAL OFFICER OF THE PUBLIC EMPLOYER OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL WHERE REQUIRED BY LAW SHALL INSTITUTE AN ACTION FOR EQUITABLE RELIEF, EITHER IN THE COURT OF COMMON PLEAS OF THE JURISDICTION WHERE THE STRIKE HAS OCCURRED OR THE COMMONWEALTH COURT.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2190PN3277 - 2 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829